Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-237
County fair; dissolution; final report.

Upon the dissolution of any such county fair board in the manner provided in sections 2-232 to 2-236, the county fair board in such county shall cease to exist as an official body of such county, except for the purpose of making its final report and accounting and returning its records. An appointed county fair board shall make its report and accounting and return its records to the county board. An elected county fair board shall publish its final report and accounting one time in a newspaper of general circulation in the county and shall file such report and accounting and its records with the county clerk for inspection by the public.

Laws 1927, c. 51, § 6, p. 206;

C.S.1929, § 2-227;

R.S.1943, § 2-237;

Laws 1999, LB 437, § 15.